Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB592.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 304 of Title 30 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 304. Waterways patrolmen and employees.(a) Appointment and compensation.--[The] Except as provided in subsection (c), the executive director, with the approval of the commission, shall, in accordance with law and the classification and compensation plans of the Commonwealth as established by the Executive Board, appoint and fix the compensation of such number of waterways patrolmen and other employees as the commission deems necessary to enforce and carry out the provisions of this title and perform the functions and work of the commission.(c) Waterways conservation officers.--Each full-time 123456789101112131415161718 waterways conservation officer whose duty it is to enforce this title shall be classified in the same manner as members of the Pennsylvania State Police for purposes of compensation.Section 2. This act shall apply to compensation earned on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0592PN0600 - 2 - 123456